Rhode Island statutes. Title 18 Fiduciaries
Chapter 4 Powers of Fiduciaries
18-4-26.
Powers of fiduciaries in connection with environmental laws.

In addition to the powers, rights, and remedies which may be set forth in any will, trust, or other document which is the source of authority, in which no provision is made to the contrary, any fiduciary as defined according to §

18-4-15(a)(2)

shall be deemed to have the following powers, rights, and remedies to exercise, in addition to any other power he, she, or it may lawfully have in his, her, or its discretion, or if a corporation in the discretion of its duly authorized officer or committee:

To inspect and monitor property to which the fiduciary takes legal title (including interests in sole proprietorships, partnerships, or corporations and any assets owned by these business enterprises) or over which a fiduciary may exercise his, her, or its control, for the purpose of determining compliance with environmental laws affecting the property, and to respond to any actual or threatened violation of any environmental laws affecting the property held or controlled by the fiduciary;

To take, on behalf of an estate, trust, person, or business, any action necessary to prevent, abate, or otherwise remedy any actual or threatened violation of any environmental laws affecting property held or controlled by the fiduciary, either before or after the initiation of an enforcement action by any government body;

To refuse to accept property in trust if the fiduciary determines that any property to be donated to a trust either is contaminated by any hazardous substances, or the property is being used or has been used for any activities directly or indirectly involving hazardous substances, which could result in liability to the trust, estate, person, or business or otherwise impair the value of the assets held or controlled in the trust;

To settle or compromise, at any time, any and all claims against the estate, trust, person, or business which may be asserted by any governmental body or private party, involving the alleged violation of any environmental laws affecting property held by the estate or trust or owned by the person or business; and

To disclaim any power granted by any document or any statute or rule of law which, in the sole discretion of the fiduciary, may cause the fiduciary to incur personal liability under any environmental laws.

For purposes of this section, “environmental laws” mean any federal, state, or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to protection of the environment or human health. For purposes of this section, “hazardous substances” mean any substances defined as hazardous or toxic or otherwise regulated by any environmental laws.

The fiduciary shall be entitled to charge the reasonable cost of any inspection, insurance, review, abatement, response, or cleanup, or any other remedial action, as authorized in this section, against the income or principal of the estate, trust, personal estate, or business assets and shall not be personally responsible for those costs. The fiduciary shall not be personally liable to any beneficiary or any other party for any decrease in value or exhaustion of assets by reason of the fiduciary’s reasonable compliance with any environmental laws, specifically including any reporting requirements under those laws.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all fiduciary relationships now in existence or subsequently created, and to the fiduciary actions or inactions occurring after July 21, 1992.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 421, § 1.

18-4-27.
Validity of trusts.

A trust which is otherwise valid and which has been created by a written instrument, including, but not limited to, a trust in which the principal is composed in whole or in part of real property, shall not be held invalid for any one or more of the following reasons:

Because the settlor, or another person, or both, possess the power to revoke, amend, alter, or modify the trust in whole or in part;

Because the settlor, or another person, or both, possess the power to appoint, by deed or will, the persons and organizations to whom the income shall be paid or the principal distributed;

Because the settlor, or another person, or both, possess the power to add to, or withdraw from, the trust all or any part of the principal or income at one or at different times;

Because the settlor, or another person, or both, possess the power to remove the trustee or trustees and appoint a successor trustee or trustees;

Because the settlor has retained the right to receive all or part of the income of the trust during his or her life or for any part of his or her life; or

Because the settlor is the sole trustee and the sole current beneficiary of the trust during his or her lifetime.

This section shall apply to all trusts created by written instrument, except where the validity of the trust is in issue in a case pending on August 11, 1995.

The doctrine of merger shall not apply to invalidate an otherwise valid revocable or irrevocable trust unless the legal title to the trust property and the entire beneficial interest, including future and contingent beneficial interests, become irrevocably united in one person who is not under an incapacity.

If the beneficiary of a spendthrift trust having the entire beneficial interest in the trust property becomes without his or her consent the sole trustee, the beneficiary may procure the appointment of a new trustee and have the trust reconstituted.

Nothing contained in this section shall affect the validity of those accounts, including, but not limited to, bank accounts, share accounts, deposits, certificates of deposit, savings certificates, and other similar arrangements, previously or subsequently established at any bank, savings and loan association, or credit union by one or more persons, in trust for one or more other persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 29.

18-4-28.
Trustee’s power to adjust.

A trustee may adjust between principal and income to the extent the trustee considers it to be advisable if the trustee invests and manages trust assets as a prudent investor and the terms of the trust describe the amount that may or must be distributed to a beneficiary by referring to the trust’s income.

In deciding whether and to what extent to exercise the power conferred by subsection (a), a trustee shall consider all factors relevant to the trust and its beneficiaries, including the following factors to the extent they are relevant:

The nature, purpose and expected duration of the trust;

The intent of the settler;

The identity and circumstances of the beneficiaries;

The needs for liquidity, regularity of income and preservation and appreciation of capital;

The assets held in the trust, the extent to which they consist of financial assets, interests in closely held enterprises, tangible and intangible personal property or real property, the extent to which an asset is used by a beneficiary, and whether an asset was purchased by the trustee or received from the settler;

The increase or decrease in the value of the principal assets, which the trustee may estimate as to assets for which market values are not readily available;

Whether and to what extent the terms of the trust give the trustee the power to invade principal or accumulate income or prohibit the trustee from invading principal or accumulating income, and the extent to which the trustee has exercised a power from time to time to invade principal or accumulate income;

The actual and anticipated effect of economic conditions on principal and income and effects of inflation and deflation; and

The anticipated tax consequences of an adjustment.

A trustee may not make an adjustment:

That diminishes the income interest in a trust that requires all of the income to be used at least annually to a surviving spouse and for which an estate tax or gift tax marital deduction would be allowed, in whole or in part, if the trustee did not have the power to make the adjustment;

That reduces the actuarial value of the income interest in a trust to which a person transfers property with the intent to qualify for a gift tax exclusion;

That changes the amount payable to a beneficiary as a fixed annuity or a fixed fraction of the value of the trust assets;

From any amount that is permanently set aside for charitable purposes under a will or the terms of a trust unless both income and principal are so set aside;

If possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment causes an individual to be treated as the owner of all or a part of the trust for income tax purposes, and the individual would not be treated as the owner if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

If possessing or exercising the power to make an adjustment causes all or part of the trust assets to be included for estate tax purposes in the estate of an individual who has the power to remove a trustee or appoint a trustee, or both, and the assets would not be included in the estate of the individual if the trustee did not possess the power to make an adjustment;

If the trustee is a beneficiary of the trust; or

If the trustee is not a beneficiary, but the adjustment would benefit the trustee directly or indirectly.

If subsections (c)(5), (6), (7) or (8) herein apply to a trustee and there is more than one trustee, a co-trustee to whom the provision does not apply may make the adjustment unless the exercise of the power by the remaining trustee or trustees is not permitted by the terms of the trust.

A trustee may release the entire power conferred by subsection (a) or may release only the power to adjust from income to principal or the power to adjust from principal to income if the trustee is uncertain about whether possessing or exercising the power will cause a result described in subsections (c)(1) — (6) or (c)(8) herein or if the trustee determines that possessing or exercising the power will or may deprive the trust of a tax benefit or impose a tax burden not described in subsection (c) herein. The release may be permanent or for a specified period, including a period measured by the life of an individual.

Terms of a trust that limit the power of a trustee to make an adjustment between principal and income do not affect the application of this section unless it is clear from the terms of the trust that the terms are intended to deny the trustee the power of adjustment conferred in subsection (a) herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 191, § 1.

18-4-29.
Total return unitrusts — Alternative definition of income.

The following provisions shall apply to a trust which by its governing instrument, pursuant to court reformation or pursuant to adjustment in accordance with §

18-4-28

requires the distribution at least annually of an amount equal to a fixed percentage of not less than three percent (3%) nor more than five percent (5%) per year of the net fair market value of the trust’s assets (the “Unitrust Amount”) valued at least annually, such trust to be referred to as a “Total Return Unitrust”:

The Unitrust Amount may be determined by reference to the net fair market value of the trust’s assets in one year or more than one year.

Distribution of such a fixed percentage Unitrust Amount is considered a distribution of all of the income of the Total Return Unitrust and shall not be considered a fundamental departure from state law.

Such a distribution of the fixed percentage of not less than three percent (3%) not more than five percent (5%) is considered to be a reasonable apportionment of the total return of a Total Return Unitrust.

A Total Return Unitrust that provides for a fixed percentage in excess of five percent (5%) per year shall be considered to have paid out all of the income of the Total Return Unitrust, and to have paid out principal of the Total Return Unitrust to the extent that the fixed percentage payout exceeds five percent (5%) per year.

The governing instrument (including any changes effected by court reformation) may or may not grant discretion to the trustee to adopt a consistent practice of treating capital gains as part of the unitrust distribution, to the extent that the Unitrust Amount exceeds the net accounting income, or it may specify the ordering of such classes of income.

Unless the terms of the governing instrument (including any changes effected by court reformation) specifically provide otherwise or grant discretion to the trustee as set forth above, a distribution of the Unitrust Amount shall be considered to have been made from the following sources in order of priority:

From ordinary income determined as if the trust were not a unitrust;

From ordinary income not allocable to net accounting income;

From net realized short-term capital gains;

From net realized long-term capital gains; and

From the principal of the trust estate.

The governing instrument (including any changes effected by court reformation or adjustment by the trustee) may provide that assets used by the trust beneficiary, such as residence property or tangible personal property, may be excluded from the net fair market value for computing to the Unitrust Amount. Such use may be considered equivalent to income or the Unitrust Amount.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 191, § 1.

18-4-30.
Representation by person having substantially identical interest.

In any action involving wills, estates, trusts or fiduciaries in the Probate Court or the Superior Court, a minor, an incapacitated person or an unborn or unascertained person whose identity and location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, unless otherwise represented, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent that:

The person’s interest is adequately represented; and

There is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 190, § 1.

18-4-31.
Power to invade principal in trust.

Unless the trust instrument expressly provides otherwise or unless the trust is a “Special Needs Trust” or “Supplemental Needs Trust” created in accordance with 42 United States Code section 1396p(d)(4)(A), a trustee who has authority under the terms of a trust to invade the principal of the trust, referred to in this section as the “first trust,” to make distributions to or for the benefit of one or more persons, may instead exercise such authority by appointing all or part of the principal of the trust subject to the power in favor of a trustee of another trust, referred to in this section as the “second trust,” for the current benefit of one or more of such persons under the same trust instrument or under a different trust instrument, provided:

The beneficiaries of the second trust may include only beneficiaries of the first trust;

The second trust may not reduce any fixed income, annuity or unitrust interest in the assets of the first trust; and

If any contribution to the first trust qualified for a marital or charitable deduction for federal income, gift or estate tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended 26 U.S.C. § 1, et seq., the second trust shall not contain any provisions which, if included in the first trust, would have prevented the first trust from qualifying for such a deduction or would have reduced the amount of such deduction.

The exercise of a power to invade principal under subsection (a) shall be by an instrument in writing, signed and acknowledged by the trustee, and filed with the records of the first trust.

The exercise of a power to invade principal under subsection (a) shall be considered the exercise of a power of appointment, other than a power to appoint to the trustee, the trustee’s creditors, the trustee’s estate, or the creditors of the trustee’s estate.

The trustee shall notify all Qualified Beneficiaries (as hereinafter defined) of the first trust, in writing, of the manner in which the trustee intends to exercise the power, such notice to be at least sixty (60) days prior to the effective date of the trustee’s exercise of the trustee’s power to invade principal. A copy of the proposed instrument exercising the power shall satisfy the trustee’s notice obligation under this subsection. If all Qualified Beneficiaries waive the notice period by signed written instrument delivered to the trustee, the trustee’s power to invade principal shall be exercisable immediately. The trustee’s notice under this subsection shall not limit the right of any beneficiary to object to the exercise of the trustee’s power to invade principal except as provided in other applicable provisions of this title.

“Qualified Beneficiary” means a living beneficiary who, on the date the beneficiary’s qualifications is determined:

Is a distributee or permissible distribute of trust income or principal;

Would be a distribute or permissible distribute of trust income or principal if the interests of the distributes described in subsection (a) terminated on that date without causing the trust to terminate; or

Would be a distributee or permissible distribute of trust income or principal if the trust terminated in accordance with its terms on that date.

The exercise of the power to invade principal under subsection (a) is not prohibited by a spendthrift clause or by a provision in the trust instrument that prohibits amendment or revocation of the trust.

Nothing in this section is intended to create or imply a duty to exercise a power to invade principal, and no inference of impropriety shall be made as a result of a trustee not exercising the power to invade principal conferred under subsection (a).

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to abridge the right of any trustee who has a power of invasion to appoint property in further trust that arises under the terms of the first trust or under any other section of this title or under another provisions of law or under common law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 403, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 310, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 418, § 1.